Tennessee, session 114, HB0393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) When a canine that was utilized in the service of the department of correction
is retired due to age, service-related injury, or any other reason, and the canine is retired
to the care and custody of a correctional officer, whether active or retired, the
department, from funds budgeted to the department through the general appropriations
act, shall pay, on a monthly basis, the officer caring for the retired canine the sum of
eighty-five dollars ($85.00) to be used exclusively for the medical care of the retired
canine.
(b) The officer with custody of the retired canine shall maintain records of all
medical treatment provided to the retired canine in the officer's care and custody and, by
June 1 of each year, submit a copy of these medical records to the department of
correction for the fiscal year ending at the end of that month.
(c) Within thirty (30) days of the death of a retired canine in the care of a
correctional officer, the officer shall notify the department of correction of the canine's
death. The department shall terminate the monthly medical treatment payments to the
officer provided by this section upon receiving notification pursuant to this subsection (c).
HB0393
000001
- 1 -

(d) The monthly amount set out in subsection (a) is in addition to any amount
that is otherwise due and paid to the officer by virtue of salary, retirement, disability, or
other reason.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000001